Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 5011, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5011. A. Except as otherwise provided by this section,
beginning with the calendar year 1990 and for each calendar year
through 1998, and for calendar year 2003, any individual who is a
resident of and is domiciled in this state during the entire
calendar year for which the filing is made and whose gross household

Req. No. 12642 Page 1

inco me for such year does not exceed Twelve Thousand Dollars
($12,000.00) may file a claim for sales tax relief.
B. For calendar years 1999, 2002 and 2004, any individual who
is a resident of and is domiciled in this state during the entire
calendar year for which the filing is made may file a claim for
sales tax relief if the gross household income for such year does
not exceed the following amounts:
1. For an individual not subject to the provisions of paragraph
2 of this subsection and claiming no allowable personal exemption
other than the allowable personal exemption for that individual or
the spouse of that individual, Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00); or
2. For an individual claiming one or more allowable personal
exemptions other than the allowable personal exemption for that
individual or the spouse of that individual, an individual with a
physical disability constituting a substantial handicap to
employment, or an individual who is sixty-five (65) years of age or
older at the close of the tax year, Thirty Thousand Dollars
($30,000.00).
C. For calendar years 2000, 2001, 2005 and following through
2024, an individual who is a resident of and is domiciled in this
state during the entire calendar year for which the filing is made
may file a claim for sales tax relief if the gross household income
for such year does not exceed the following amounts:
Req. No. 12642 Page 2

1. For an individual not subject to the provisions of paragraph
2 of this subsection and claiming no allowable personal exemption
other than the allowable personal exemption for that individual or
the spouse of that individual, Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00);
or
2. For an individual claiming one or more allowable personal
exemptions other than the allowable personal exemption for that
individual or the spouse of that individual, an individual with a
physical disability constituting a substantial handicap to
employment, or an individual who is sixty-five (65) years of age or
older at the close of the tax year, Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00).
D. The amount of the claim filed pursuant to the Sales Tax
Relief Act shall be Forty Dollars ($40.00) multiplied by the number
of allowable personal exemptions. For calendar year 2025 and
following, an individual who is a resident of and is domiciled in
this state during the entire calendar year for which the filing is
made may file a claim for sales tax relief if the gross household
income for such year does not exceed the following amounts:
1. For a single filer or married filing separately claiming no
allowable personal exemption other than the allowable personal
exemption for that individual, Fifty-five Thousand Dollars
($55,000.00);

Req. No. 12642 Page 3

2. For a single filer or married filing separately claiming no
allowable personal exemption other than the allowable personal
exemption for that individual who is sixty-five (65) years of age or
older, Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00);
3. For a single filer with a disability, Seventy-five Thousand
Dollars ($75,000.00);
4. For a family filing head of household, married filing
jointly, married filing separately with at least one dependent, or
widowed, Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).
E. For calendar year 2025 and thereafter, the amount of the
claim filed pursuant to the Sales Tax Relief Act shall be Two
Hundred Dollars ($200.00) multiplied by the number of allowable
personal exemptions.
F. The amount of the credit provided in subsection E shall be
reduced by a percent of gross household income in excess of the
income limitations provided in subsection D. The amount of credit
shall be reduced as follows:
1. If the gross household income, as provided in paragraph 1 of
subsection D of this section, exceeds Fifty-five Thousand Dollars
($55,000.00), the credit amount shall be reduced, but not below zero
(0), by one percent (1%) of gross household income in excess of
Fifty-five Thousand Dollars ($55,000.00);
2. If the gross household income, as provided in paragraph 2 or
paragraph 3 of subsection D of this section, exceeds Seventy-five
Req. No. 12642 Page 4

Thou sand Dollars ($75,000.00), the credit amount shall be reduced,
but not below zero (0), by one-half percent (0.5%) of gross
household income in excess of the Seventy-five Thousand Dollars
($75,000.000);
3. If the gross household income, as provided in paragraph 4 of
subsection D of this section, exceeds Seventy-five Thousand Dollars
($75,000.00), the credit amount shall be reduced, but not below zero
(0), by one and one-half percent (1.5%) of gross household income in
excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.000);
G. As used in the Sales Tax Relief Act, "allowable personal
exemption" means a personal exemption to which the taxpayer would be
entitled pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act,
except for:
1. The exemptions such taxpayer would be entitled to pursuant
to Section 2358 of this title if such taxpayer or spouse is blind or
sixty-five (65) years of age or older at the close of the tax year;
2. An exemption for a person convicted of a felony if during
all or any part of the calendar year for which the claim is filed
such person was an inmate in the custody of the Department of
Corrections; or
3. An exemption for a person if during all or any part of the
calendar year for which the claim is filed such person resided
outside of this state;

Req. No. 12642 Page 5

E. H. A person convicted of a felony shall not be permitted to
file a claim for sales tax relief pursuant to the provisions of
Sections 5010 through 5016 of this title for the period of time
during which the person is an inmate in the custody of the
Department of Corrections. Such period of time shall include the
entire calendar year if the person is in the custody of the
Department of Corrections during any part of the calendar year. The
provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit all other members
of the household of an inmate from filing a claim based upon the
personal exemptions to which the household members would be entitled
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.
F. I. The Department of Corrections shall withhold up to fifty
percent (50%) of any money inmates receive for claims made pursuant
to the Sales Tax Relief Act prior to September 1, 1991, for costs of
incarceration.
G. J. For purposes of Section 139.105 of Title 17 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, the gross household income of any individual who
may file a claim for sales tax relief shall not exceed Twelve
Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12642 AO 02/20/25


Req. No. 12642 Page 6